errortag-src/twol-sme.txt
! Overlapping => constraint wrt. 'i:e', Optional Vow Shortening
! After short 1st Syllable
! The ¤: condition was added in order to account for VIVVA nouns.
! First, it was added as optional, with parentheses, but that did not
! work, for some strange reason. Then the parentheses were removed, and to our
! surprise both forms with and without ¤ worked.
! And parantheses in again. Sigh.


!"Optional Vowel Shortening after Short 1st Syllable"
! Vx:Vy => [ (Hyph) #:  | Cns ] [a|i|o|u] [ Cns Cns:+ | j: Cns:+ | h: ': Cns: ]
!  Vx:Vy => [ (Hyph) #:  | Cns ] [a|i|o|u] [ Cns Cns:+ | h: ': Cns: ]
!	_ (StemCns:*) [ X7: | X8: ] ;
!	   where Vx in (u i)
!	         Vy in (o e)
!	   matched ;
! Added + to Cns:+ and made StmCns: optional in LC, for biv'du:bivdo
! Onset relevant?



!"Shortening of á in Compounds after Long 1st Syllable 1"
!  á:a <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns _ StemCns:* [ X7: | X8: ] ;



!"Shortening of á in Compounds after Long 1st Syllable 2"
!  á:a <=> [ (Hyph) #:  | Cns ] Vz Cns+ Cns: Cns+ _ StemCns:* [ X7: | X8: ]
!        where Vz in (a i o u) ;

!"Vowel lowering for buorre"
! Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns _ X8: ;
!         where Vx in (u i)
!	       Vy in (o e)
!	         matched ;
! This rule was actually made for one word only, buorre:buoret
! It replaces the missing "| X8:" sequence that is commented out in the
! "Vowel shortening ... 1" rule above. Why X8: does not work there is unclear.
! It seems to work in certain other cases, though.
!€ buorriX7#
!€ buorre00

!€ buorriX8#
!€ buo0re00


!"Vowel Shortening in Vowel-Final Compounds after Long 1st Syllable 1"
!  Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns: _ X7: ;
!	where Vx in (u i)
!	      Vy in (o e)
!	matched ;
! This rule was difficult. Look at *)footnote 1 below for comments.
! *) footnote 1
! Older, removed versions:
! Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns: _ StemCns:* X7: ;
! This one gave vuovden# as only possible form of vuovdin in compounds.
! Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns _ StemCns:* [ X7: | X8: ] ;
! the problem with this one was that it was not restricted to compounds !!
! The X7: | X8: line was commented out since no lexicon in sme-lex.txt
! pointed from X8 to R. This move should be checked for compounds later.
! The testcases are kept here to ensure that its workload is being taken care of.
!€ várriX7gir'ku#
!€ várre0gir0ku0


!"Vowel Shortening in Compounds after Long 1st Syllable 2"
!  Vx:Vy <=> [ (Hyph) #:  | Cns ] Vz Cns+ Cns: Cns+ _ StemCns:* [ X7: | X8: ] ;
!	where Vz in (a i o u) ;
!	where Vx in (u i)
!			             Vy in (o e)
!					   matched ;
! XXX Remainder! This rule is commented out since including it
! spoils the i:á alternation of verbs (boahtit:boađán, for some reason.
! This should be looked into.

!"Vowel Shortening in Cns-Final Compounds"
!  Vx:Vy <=> Cns:+ _ StemCns:+ X7: ;
!	   where Vx in (u i)                  ! example?
!		     Vy in (o e)
!       matched ;
! This is for the vuovdin# and vuovden#, if vuovden# exists.
! If vuovden# etc. is not possible, this rule should be removed.


!"Vowel Shortening in Compounds of Contract Stems"
!  Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns: _ StemCns:* X4: X7: ;
!	    where Vx in (u i)
!	          Vy in (o e)
!	    matched ;

!"Compulsory Vowel Shortening after ij"                ! liigi : liigeruđaid
! Vx:Vy <=> [ (Hyph) #:  | Cns ] i j:i Cns:* _ [ X7: | X8: ] ;
!	   where Vx in (u i)
!	         Vy in (o e)
!	   matched ;
! The rule is too general at the moment, since we do not have illu : illosáhka,
! Now, we have "Cns:*", the earlier version said "': Cns", and that was wrong,
! it did not give liidni > liidne-. Still, *illo- must be a different problem,
! since it has short vowel before the consonants. I leave the rule as it is now
! and reconsider the illu case.
!€ lijgiX7#ruh'taX4jd#
!€ liige00ru00đa0id0

!FOLLOWING TwO RULES COMMENTED OUT BECAUSE THEY ARE TOO CATEGORICAL, new rules under optional vowelshortening e:i, u:o
!"Optional Vowel Shortening in Caritives"
!  Vx:Vy => [ (Hyph) #:  | Cns ] [a|i|o|u] Cns:+ _ ( DelCns:) X9: ;
!	   where Vx in (u i)
!		 Vy in (o e)
!	   matched ;
! Hmm. X9 is used only in the DenominalAdjsV lexicon., in front of
! heapmi, huvva, huhtti, hudda.

!"Vowel Shortening in Caritives"
!  Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ _ ( DelCns:) X9: ;
!	    where Vx in (u i)
!	          Vy in (o e)
!	    matched ;



! Verbs

"Vowel Shortening in Bisyllabic Sg2 Imperatives and Connegatives"
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Q6: ;
	    where Vx in (u i)                  ! čuor'vu:čuorvvo
	          Vy in (o e)                  ! boah'ti:boađe
	    matched ;
!€ čuor'vuQ6
!€ čuorvvo0


!€ boah'tiQ6
!€ boa00đe0


! Adjectives

"Vowel Shortening in Attributive Forms, V-final Adjectives" ! láj'kiW1s:láikkes
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns:+ _  ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ W1: | W2: ] s [(Hyph) [ # | #: ]|(Hyph)]  ;           ! ál'kiW2s:álkes
	    where Vx in (u i)
	          Vy in (o e)
	    matched ;

!€ láj'kiW1s#
!€ láikke0s0

!€ ál'kiW2s#
!€ ál0ke0s0

                        ! W1 for WeG Attr, W2 for non-CG Attr form.

"Vowel Shortening in Attributive Forms, s-final Adjectives" ! váttisW1:váttes W2??
   Vx:Vy <=> Cns:+ _  s ( %>: ) ( »: ) W1:  [ Hyph |  [ # | #: ] ] ; ! trying to get heajos-biila as well as heajosbiila
	    where Vx in (u i)
		      Vy in (o e)
		matched ;
!  Vx:Vy <=> Cns:+ _  ( %>: ) ( »: ) s W1: ; ! (Hyph) #:  ;  ! orig

!€ váttisW1#
!€ váttes00

!€ head'jusW1-
!€ hea00jos0-

!€ head'jusW1#
!€ hea00jos00

!€ váttisW1-
!€ váttes0-


! The rule now works for all "s W1:" right contexts. This means that ess of
! guorus becomes guorrosin, as required. Check for side-effects.


"Optional vowel-shortening i:e"
 i:e => Cns:+ _ (Cns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (X4:) W4: ;   !in diminutive verbs, caritives


"Optional vowel-shortening u:o"
 u:o => Cns:+ _ (Cns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) (X4:) W4: ; !Diminutive geaffut:geafustit/geafostit, caritives


! Diphtong simplification
! -----------------------



"Diphthong Simplification in i-Stems before Suffixes Beginning with j:"
!  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ [ i | e7:i ] X5: ; ! Cannot see why e7:1 here. Thj
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+  i  ( %>: ) ( »: ) X5: ;
	where Vx in (e o a) ;          ! goah'tiX5jd:go0điid
! Cf. alt 2 below...

!€ goah'tiX5jd
!€ go000đi0id


! Two possible strategies for fixing bug 56, the oahpaheaddjiid bug:
! ------------------------------------------------------------------
! 1. lexical strategy: XX instead of X5, and marking in the lexicon
! PrsPtc then do not go to GOAHTI, but to OAHPAHEADDJI, and point to
!  :XX GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
!"Optional Diphthong Simplification in Strong-Grade i-Stems before Suffixes Beginning with j:"
!  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ [ i | e7:e ] XX: ; !XX is just an example of how we might do it...
!	where Vx in (e o a) ;          ! goah'tiX5jd:go0điid
! pro: do not need to define G3.
! pro: Opens for lexical variation: moarsi, etc, PrsPtc, Comp must be marked XX or redirected
! con: have to build a set of new lexica, identical to GOAHTI, except for the ref to GODII.
! con: gives a lexical solution to a basically morphophonological problem

! 2. morphophonological strategy, the smj way.
! Define a G3 context, and integrate it into a further rule
!"Optional Diphthong Simplification in Strong-Grade i-Stems before Suffixes Beginning with j:"
!  Vx:0 => Vow _ G3 [ i | e7:e ] X5: ; !G3 to be defined...
!	where Vx in (e o a) ;          ! goah'tiX5jd:go0điid
! pro: linguistically the right approach, says intuition
! pro: no need for confusing new lexica
! con: defining G3 is a mess, at best
! We have optional dipht. simpl. only in G3-nouns and no cons grad.

! Going for 2:

!"G12 Compulsatory Diphthong Simplification in i-Stems before Suffixes Beginning with j:"
!  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ G12 [ i | e7:e ] X5: ;
!	where Vx in (e o a) ;          ! goah'tiX5jd:go0điid

!"G3 Facultative Diphthong Simplification in i-Stems before Suffixes Beginning with j:"
!  Vx:0 => Vow _ G3 [ i | e7:e ] X5: ;
!	where Vx in (e o a) ;          ! goah'tiX5jd:go0điid

!Using this one while waiting for the G3 rule to be fixed.
!"Diphthong Simplification in i-Stems before Suffixes Beginning with j:"
!  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns [':Cns|Cns] Cns:+ [ i | e7:e ] X5: ;
!	where Vx in (e o a) ;          ! goah'tiX5jd:go0điid





KEEPIF(DIPHSIMPL)
"Diphthong Simplification in Actor Nouns from i- and a-Stems (Optional)" ! vieh'ki > vihkkiin
  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ [ i: | a: ] ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ) X5: ;				                 ! viehkkiin
			where Vx in (e o a) ;				                         ! Eastern, substandard
ELSE
! Use this variant in normative contexts:
"Diphthong Simplification in Actor Nouns from i- and a-Stems"	! vieh'ki > vihkkiin
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ [ i: | a: ] ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ) X5: ;			            ! Western and norm
			where Vx in (e o a) ;
ENDKEEP

!€ vieh'ki¤X5jn
!€ vi0hkki00in

"Diphthong Simplification in Certain Forms from u-Stems"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ [ u: | o7: ] ( %>: ) ( »: )
                         [ X2: | X3: | (DelCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) X6: | Q8: | Y5: | Y6: ] ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

KEEPIF(DIPHSIMPL)
"Diphthong Simplification in Actor Nouns from u-Verbs (Optional)"
  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ u:  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ X3: | X5: ] ;             ! Eastern, substandard
			where Vx in (e o a) ;
ELSE
! Use this variant in normative contexts:
"Diphthong Simplification in Actor Nouns from u-Verbs"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ u:  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ) X3: ;            ! Western and norm
			where Vx in (e o a) ;
ENDKEEP

"Diphthong Simplification in Diminutives etc. from Trisyllabics with 2nd Syll u/o"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ [ u: | o7: ]  ( %>: ) ( »: ) ( NonMPDummy:) Cns:+  ( %>: ) ( »: ) X2: ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification: Conditional in -alla- etc. Derivatives from Trisyllabics"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ u:o ( %>: ) ( »: ) ( NonMPDummy:) Cns:+ ( %>: ) ( »: ) X1: ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification in IllSg and Certain Conjug. Forms of a-Stems"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ a:  ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ X3: | Q2: | Q3: | Y7: ] ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification in Certain Conjugational Forms of i- and u-Stems"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ HighVow:  ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ Q2: | Q3: | Q7: | Y7: ] ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification: Optional before Deverbal -alla-, -adda-, -us"
  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ o7: ( %>: ) ( »: ) ( NonMPDummy:) Cns:+ ( %>: ) ( »: ) X1: ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification in u-Stems before Conditional Marker"
  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ u: ( %>: ) ( »: ) Q5: ;
			where Vx in (a e o) ;

"Dipthtong simplification in the attribute forms of AD-adjectives"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ Vow ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ Y9: | X9: ] ;
		       where Vx in (a e o) ;

"Diphthong Simplification: Optional before Deverbal st+alla-, st+adda-"
  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ u:o ( %>: ) ( »: ) W5: ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;


! Vowel Rising
! ------------

"Vowel Rising"
  Vx:Vy <=> Vow: (Cns:*) (%^:) Cns:+ _ ( CntrCns:0 ) ( %>: ) ( »: ) ( Dummy:+ - W9: ) j:i ;
			where Vx in (e o)
			      Vy in (i u)
			matched ;

! There is a conflict between e7:i here and e7:á in the Metaphony
! chapter. (e7 is "e with dot below" from the dictionary).
! We need to either restrict the context in the M chapter, or
! in the Vowel Rising part. For now, we try out without the e7:i.
! Needed: Documentation on all the rules in the M chapter.
!			where Vx in (e o e7)
!			      Vy in (i u i )

! The original version had Vx = e,o for Vowel Rising and
! Vx = i,e7,u for General metaphony. Thus, the new feature is
! e7 for Vowel rising.

!€ reŋ'koX2jd
!€ reŋ0ku0id

!€ basteX2j
!€ basti0i

!€ asibealle7X2j
!€ asibealli0ide
! Note. This will fail for now.
! -bealle +sg.ill = -beallái, +pl. ill = -beliide,

!€ LineX2j
!€ Lini0i

! should be Linii, exactly, fine, and is as well.

! Metaphony
! ---------

"General Metaphony"
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ Cns:* ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ X2: | X6: ] ;
			where Vx in (i e7 u)
			      Vy in (á á o)
			matched ;

!€ áhččiX2n
!€ áhččá0n
